Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 36
ABANDONED MOTOR VEHICLES

Sec.

§ 49-3601. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 49-3602 — 49-3604. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-3605. Certification of tow truck operator to dispose of vehicles — Bond

Compliance required. [Repealed.]

§ 49-3606. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-3607. Local ordinances. [Repealed.]

§ 49-3608 — 49-3621. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-3622. Disposition of proceeds. [Repealed.]